Wisconsin, session 2025, AB283.
do enact as follows:AB283,11Section 1. 71.07 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,2,3271.07 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) 3(a) (ar).AB283,24Section 2. 71.07 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,2,11571.07 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 6amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, 7as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such 8investment, and the amount of the investment in establishing an employee costs 9incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in s. 10238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined by 11the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.AB283,312Section 3. 71.28 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,2,141371.28 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) 14(a) (ar).AB283,415Section 4. 71.28 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,3,51671.28 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 17amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, 1as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such 2investment, and the amount of the investment made in establishing an employee 3costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in 4s. 238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined 5by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.AB283,56Section 5. 71.47 (3y) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,3,8771.47 (3y) (a) 2. “Eligible employee” has the meaning given in s. 238.308 (1) 8(a) (ar).AB283,69Section 6. 71.47 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,3,161071.47 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 11amount of the investment in the form of capital expenditures on workforce housing, 12as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such 13investment, and the amount of the investment made in establishing an employee 14costs incurred to provide child care program for services for employees, as defined in 15s. 238.308 (1) (ag), not to exceed 15 percent of such investment costs, as determined 16by the Wisconsin Economic Development Corporation.AB283,717Section 7. 238.308 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 238.308 (1) (ar).AB283,818Section 8. 238.308 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB283,3,2019238.308 (1) (ag) “Costs incurred to provide child care services for employees” 20includes all of the following:AB283,3,21211. Capital expenditures made to establish a child care program for employees.AB283,3,22222. Expenditures made for the operation of a child care program under subd. 1.AB283,3,23233. Expenditures to reimburse employees for child care expenses.AB283,3,24244. Expenditures to purchase or reserve child care slots on behalf of employees.AB283,4,215. Contributions made by an employer to an employee’s dependent care 2flexible spending account.AB283,4,436. Any other cost or expense incurred due to a benefit provided by an employer 4to facilitate the provision or utilization by employees of child care services.AB283,95Section 9. 238.308 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,4,76238.308 (2) (a) 1. The Subject to par. (d), the person is operating or intends to 7operate a business in this state.AB283,108Section 10. 238.308 (2) (d) of the statutes is created to read:AB283,4,119238.308 (2) (d) The corporation may certify a nonprofit entity described in 10section 501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code for tax benefits for costs incurred to 11provide child care services for employees under sub. (4) (a) 6.AB283,1112Section 11. 238.308 (4) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB283,4,1813238.308 (4) (a) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, an 14amount equal to up to 15 percent of the person’s investment in the form of capital 15expenditures on workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees and 16up to 15 percent of the person’s investment in establishing an employee costs 17incurred to provide child care program for services for employees. Such 18investments may include only capital expenditures made by the person.AB283,1219Section 12. Initial applicability.AB283,4,2020(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.AB283,4,2121